Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LEAD SERVICE LINE REPLACEMENT GRANTS.new text end new text begin $240,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Public Facilities Authority to provide grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 446A.077. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2033. new text end